ASPELL6/portugues/pt_PT.aff
SFX Y Y 125
SFX Y   r              va             ar
SFX Y   r              vas            ar
SFX Y   0              0ar            ar
SFX Y   0              0ar            ar
SFX Y   r              vam            ar
SFX Y   ar             ei             [^cÇg]ar
SFX Y   car            quei           car
SFX Y   gar            guei           gar
SFX Y   0              0              Çar
SFX Y   r              ste            ar
SFX Y   ar             ou             ar
SFX Y   0              0ar            ar
SFX Y   r              stes           ar
SFX Y   0              am             ar
SFX Y   0              a              ar
SFX Y   0              as             ar
SFX Y   0              0ar            ar
SFX Y   0              0ar            ar
SFX Y   0              ei             ar
SFX Y   0                             ar
SFX Y   0                             ar
SFX Y   0              emos           ar
SFX Y   0              eis            ar
SFX Y   0                             ar
SFX Y   r              sse            ar
SFX Y   r              sses           ar
SFX Y   0              0ar            ar
SFX Y   0              0ar            ar
SFX Y   r              ssem           ar
SFX Y   0              es             ar
SFX Y   0              mos            ar
SFX Y   0              des            ar
SFX Y   0              em             ar
SFX Y   0              ia             ar
SFX Y   0              ias            ar
SFX Y   0                             ar
SFX Y   0                             ar
SFX Y   0              iam            ar
SFX Y   r              ndo            ar
SFX Y   r              do             ar
SFX Y   r              da             ar
SFX Y   r              dos            ar
SFX Y   r              das            ar
SFX Y   er             ia             er
SFX Y   er             ias            er
SFX Y   0              0er            er
SFX Y   0              0er            er
SFX Y   er             iam            er
SFX Y   er             i              er
SFX Y   r              ste            er
SFX Y   r              u              er
SFX Y   r              mos            er
SFX Y   r              stes           er
SFX Y   0              am             er
SFX Y   0              a              er
SFX Y   0              as             er
SFX Y   0              0er            er
SFX Y   0              0er            er
SFX Y   0              ei             er
SFX Y   0                             er
SFX Y   0                             er
SFX Y   0              emos           er
SFX Y   0              eis            er
SFX Y   0                             er
SFX Y   r              sse            er
SFX Y   r              sses           er
SFX Y   0              0er            er
SFX Y   0              0er            er
SFX Y   r              ssem           er
SFX Y   0              es             er
SFX Y   0              mos            er
SFX Y   0              des            er
SFX Y   0              em             er
SFX Y   0              ia             er
SFX Y   0              ias            er
SFX Y   0                             er
SFX Y   0                             er
SFX Y   0              iam            er
SFX Y   r              ndo            er
SFX Y   er             ido            er
SFX Y   er             ida            er
SFX Y   er             idos           er
SFX Y   er             idas           er
SFX Y   r              a              ir
SFX Y   r              as             ir
SFX Y   0              0ir            ir
SFX Y   0              0ir            ir
SFX Y   r              am             ir
SFX Y   ir             i              ir
SFX Y   r              ste            ir
SFX Y   r              u              ir
SFX Y   r              mos            ir
SFX Y   r              stes           ir
SFX Y   0              am             ir
SFX Y   0              a              ir
SFX Y   0              as             ir
SFX Y   0              0ir            ir
SFX Y   0              0ir            ir
SFX Y   0              ei             ir
SFX Y   0                             ir
SFX Y   0                             ir
SFX Y   0              emos           ir
SFX Y   0              eis            ir
SFX Y   0                             ir
SFX Y   r              sse            ir
SFX Y   r              sses           ir
SFX Y   0              0ir            ir
SFX Y   0              0ir            ir
SFX Y   r              ssem           ir
SFX Y   0              es             ir
SFX Y   0              mos            ir
SFX Y   0              des            ir
SFX Y   0              em             ir
SFX Y   0              ia             ir
SFX Y   0              ias            ir
SFX Y   0                             ir
SFX Y   0                             ir
SFX Y   0              iam            ir
SFX Y   r              ndo            ir
SFX Y   r              do             ir
SFX Y   r              da             ir
SFX Y   r              dos            ir
SFX Y   r              das            ir
SFX Y   0              0ar            ar
SFX Y   0              0er            er

SFX Z Y 38
SFX Z   erir           iro            erir
SFX Z   ir             es             erir
SFX Z   ir             e              erir
SFX Z   r              mos            erir
SFX Z   r              s              erir
SFX Z   ir             em             erir
SFX Z   erir           ira            erir
SFX Z   erir           iras           erir
SFX Z   erir           iramos         erir
SFX Z   erir           irais          erir
SFX Z   erir           iram           erir
SFX Z   ar             io             ear
SFX Z   ar             ias            ear
SFX Z   ar             ia             ear
SFX Z   r              mos            ear
SFX Z   r              is             ear
SFX Z   ar             iam            ear
SFX Z   ar             ie             ear
SFX Z   ar             ies            ear
SFX Z   ar             emos           ear
SFX Z   ar             eis            ear
SFX Z   ar             iem            ear
SFX Z   ar             ai             ear
SFX Z   ar             iem            ear
SFX Z   ir             o              uzir
SFX Z   ir             es             uzir
SFX Z   zir            z              uzir
SFX Z   r              mos            uzir
SFX Z   r              s              uzir
SFX Z   ir             em             uzir
SFX Z   ir             a              uzir
SFX Z   ir             as             uzir
SFX Z   ir             amos           uzir
SFX Z   ir             ais            uzir
SFX Z   ir             am             uzir
SFX Z   ir             i              uzir
SFX Z   0              0ar            ar
SFX Z   0              0er            er
